Washington statutes.
RCW 31.20.090

Withdrawal from membership.

Upon notice given one year in advance a member of the corporation may withdraw from membership in the corporation at the expiration date of such notice and from said expiration date shall be free from obligations hereunder except as to those accrued prior to said expiration date.

[ 1959 c 213 s 9.]